North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 3A. Sessions; Electronic Voting.

§ 120-11.1.
Time of meeting.

The regular session of the Senate and House of Representatives shall be held biennially beginning at 12:00 noon on the second Wednesday in January next after their election, and on that day they shall meet solely to elect officers, adopt rules, and otherwise organize the session. When they adjourn that day, they stand adjourned until 12:00 noon on the third Wednesday after the second Monday in January next after their election.

History.

1967, c. 1181; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 21; 2012-194, s. 66.5(a); 2015-264, s. 68.

Cross References.

For constitutional provision, see N.C. Const., Art. II, § 11.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 68, effective October 1, 2015, substituted “12:00 noon” for “9:00 A.M.” near the middle of the first sentence.

§ 120-11.2.
Installation and use of electronic voting apparatus.

The General Assembly of North Carolina shall, in accordance with rules adopted by each of the respective bodies, vote by use of electronic voting apparatus. The electronic voting apparatus shall be purchased by and installed under the direct supervision of the Legislative Services Commission as soon as is practicable, but in any event the apparatus shall be installed and fully operational as soon as possible after January 1, 1975.

The rules of the House of Representatives and the Senate shall be amended so as to provide for the installation and use of electronic voting apparatus.

Working plans for the installation of electronic voting equipment shall be submitted to the Legislative Services Commission for approval to the end that the architectural integrity of the building may be preserved.

History.

1973, c. 488, ss. 1-3.